Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,115
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Innovation Hub Act.

Laws 2022, LB450, § 10.
July 21, 2022